Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4714
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act and shall revoke any rules or regulations inconsistent with the act by October 15, 2017.

Laws 2016, LB746, § 14;

Laws 2017, LB225, § 16.